Maryland, session 2025, SB0770.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–147.
(A) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL PROVIDE CRISIS SUPPORT AND
ASSISTANCE TO A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY WHEN A TEACHER OR OTHER
SCHOOL EMPLOYEE WITH DIRECT CONTACT WITH MINORS IS REMOVED FROM THE
CLASSROOM OR SCHOOL BUILDING DUE TO ALLEGED CRIMINAL ACTIVITY OR FOR
STUDENT SAFETY.
(B) TO PROVIDE THE SUPPORT AND ASSISTANCE FOR AN EVENT UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH:
(1) A CRISIS RESPONSE TEAM; AND
(2) STANDARDIZED CRISIS RESPONSE PROTOCOLS.
(C) (1) A CRISIS RESPONSE TEAM ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION SHALL, AT MINIMUM, INCLUDE A TRAUMA–INFORMED COUNSELOR
AND LEGAL COUNSEL.

SENATE BILL 770 3
(2) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT A CRISIS
RESPONSE TEAM BE ESTABLISHED USING THE EXISTING RESOURCES OF THE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(D) THE STANDARDIZED CRISIS RESPONSE PROTOCOLS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A COMMUNICATIONS PLAN THAT PROVIDES ACCURATE
INFORMATION TO ALL STAKEHOLDERS IN A SCHOOL’S COMMUNITY, INCLUDING
STUDENTS, SCHOOL PERSONNEL, PARENTS AND GUARDIANS, AND ANY OTHERS, IN A
MANNER THAT IS:
(I) TIMELY;
(II) CLEAR AND INFORMATIVE;
(III) COMPLIANT WITH LEGAL ADVICE; AND
(IV) TRAUMA–INFORMED;
(2) RESOURCES FOR PARENTS AND GUARDIANS THAT PROVIDE
GUIDANCE ON:
(I) AGE–APPROPRIATE METHODS TO DISCUSS DIFFICULT
TOPICS WITH CHILDREN, INCLUDING BOOKS AND WEBSITES;
(II) AGE–APPROPRIATE SYMPTOMS AND BEHAVIORS OF
CHILDREN AFFECTED BY TRAUMATIC EVENTS; AND
(III) RELEVANT MEDICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONALS
AND SERVICES;
(3) THE PROVISION OF OR REFERRAL TO TRAUMA–INFORMED
COUNSELING SERVICES FOR STUDENTS AND IMPACTED FAMILIES;
(4) RESOURCES FOR SCHOOL PERSONNEL THAT PROVIDE GUIDANCE
ON:
(I) LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM PROCEDURES AND PROTOCOLS;
(II) AGE–APPROPRIATE METHODS TO DISCUSS DIFFICULT
TOPICS WITH CHILDREN, INCLUDING BOOKS AND WEBSITES;

SENATE BILL 770
(III) AGE–APPROPRIATE SYMPTOMS AND BEHAVIORS OF
CHILDREN AFFECTED BY TRAUMATIC EVENTS AND WHEN AND TO WHOM TO REFER
CHILDREN EXHIBITING RELEVANT SYMPTOMS AND BEHAVIORS; AND
(IV) RELEVANT MEDICAL OR MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONALS
AND SERVICES;
(5) THE PLACEMENT OF IMPACTED STUDENTS IN SPACES IN THE
SCHOOL THAT MINIMIZES TRAUMA;
(6) LEGAL GUIDANCE FROM THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM ATTORNEY;
AND
(7) ANY OTHER INFORMATION DETERMINED RELEVANT BY THE
COUNTY BOARD.
(E) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE TO EACH PRINCIPAL AND AT LEAST ONE OTHER
DESIGNATED ADMINISTRATOR OF A SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY:
(I) A COPY OF AND TRAINING ON THE USE OF THE
STANDARDIZED CRISIS RESPONSE PROTOCOLS ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) CLEAR GUIDANCE ON WHEN AND HOW TO ACTIVATE THE
CRISIS RESPONSE TEAM; AND
(III) ANY OTHER ASSISTANCE CONSISTENT WITH THE INTENT OF
THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) ESTABLISH A METHOD FOR RECEIVING FEEDBACK FROM
PRINCIPALS AND OTHER LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM STAKEHOLDERS ON THE
EFFECTIVENESS OF THE STANDARDIZED CRISIS RESPONSE PROTOCOLS AND CRISIS
RESPONSE TEAM; AND
(3) CONTINUALLY UPDATE THE STANDARDIZED CRISIS RESPONSE
PROTOCOLS BASED ON:
(I) FEEDBACK FROM SCHOOL PRINCIPALS AND
STAKEHOLDERS;
(II) UPDATED BEST PRACTICES; AND

SENATE BILL 770 5
(III) A REVIEW BY THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM AFTER THE
CONCLUSION OF AN EVENT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION REQUIRING
ACTIVATION OF THE STANDARDIZED CRISIS RESPONSE PROTOCOLS AND CRISIS
RESPONSE TEAM.
6–113.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR” MEANS AN ADULT BEHAVING
IN A MANNER THAT:
(I) COMPROMISES THE SAFETY AND WELL–BEING OF A MINOR;
(II) IS EXPLOITATIVE OR HARMFUL TO A MINOR; OR
(III) IS OTHERWISE INAPPROPRIATE, INCLUDING UNWANTED
PHYSICAL CONTACT, EMOTIONAL MANIPULATION OR ABUSE, OR SHARING
INAPPROPRIATE INFORMATION.
(3) “CHILD CARE CENTER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9.5–401
OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(2)] (4) “Child sexual abuse” has the meaning stated in § 6–113.1 of this
subtitle.
[(3)] (5) (i) “Contracting agency” means an entity that contracts with
a county board or nonpublic school to provide a service to a school or the students of a
school.
(ii) “Contracting agency” includes an entity that provides
transportation to and from a school using a vehicle other than a Type I or Type II school
vehicle, in accordance with § 7–801 of this article.
[(4)] (6) “Direct contact with minors” means the care, supervision,
guidance, or control of, or routine interaction with, a minor.
[(5)] (7) “Emergent employee” means an employee hired by a county
board or nonpublic school without completing the employment history review required
under this section.
[(6)] (8) “School” means a public or nonpublic school.
[(7)] (9) “Sexual misconduct” has the meaning stated in § 6–113.1 of this
subtitle.

SENATE BILL 770
(10) “YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION” MEANS AN ORGANIZATION, AN
INSTITUTION, AN AGENCY, A GOVERNMENT PROGRAM, A COMMUNITY GROUP, OR
ANY OTHER ENTITY THAT IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE CARE, SUPERVISION, GUIDANCE,
EDUCATION, DEVELOPMENT, OR TRAINING OF MINORS, INCLUDING AFTER SCHOOL
PROGRAMS, MENTOR PROGRAMS, SUMMER CAMPS, AND RECREATIONAL SPORTS
LEAGUES AND TEAMS.
(b) A county board, nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING
ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency shall require an applicant for a position involving
direct contact with minors to submit:
(1) The contact information of the following employers:
(i) The current employer;
(ii) All former school employers, including employers for which the
applicant was an emergent employee; and
(iii) All former employers of the applicant in which the applicant was
employed in a position involving direct contact with minors within the previous 10 years;
(2) A written consent form, signed by the applicant, authorizing an
employer listed under item (1) of this subsection to release all records relating to child
sexual abuse [or], sexual misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR; [and]
(3) A written statement of whether the applicant:
(i) Has been the subject of a child sexual abuse [or], sexual
misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR investigation by any employer,
arbitrator, county board, State licensing agency, law enforcement agency, or child
protective services agency, unless the investigation resulted in a finding by:
1. The employer that allegations that the applicant engaged
in sexual misconduct OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR lacked sufficient evidence
according to the policies of the county board [or], nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER,
OR YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION;
2. An arbitrator or a county board to reject any disciplinary
action in response to allegations that the applicant engaged in sexual misconduct OR
BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR;
3. A State licensing agency that allegations that the
applicant engaged in sexual misconduct OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR lacked
sufficient evidence according to:

SENATE BILL 770 7
A. State law; or
B. The policies of the county board [or], nonpublic school,
CHILD CARE CENTER, OR YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION;
4. A law enforcement agency that allegations that the
applicant engaged in child sexual abuse were unfounded; or
5. A child protective services agency that allegations that the
applicant engaged in child sexual abuse were ruled out;
(ii) Has ever been disciplined, discharged, nonrenewed, or asked to
resign from employment, or has ever resigned from or otherwise separated from any
employment while allegations of child sexual abuse [or], sexual misconduct, OR
BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR were pending or were under investigation, or due to
an adjudication or findings of child sexual abuse [or], sexual misconduct, OR
BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR; or
(iii) Has ever had a license, professional license, or certificate
suspended, surrendered, or revoked while allegations of child sexual abuse [or], sexual
misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR were pending or under investigation,
or due to an adjudication or findings of child sexual abuse [or], sexual misconduct, OR
BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR; AND
(4) A CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES BACKGROUND CLEARANCE
FORM, WHICH THE APPLICANT HAS NOTARIZED AND SUBMITS ELECTRONICALLY
THROUGH THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES’ MYDHR WEB PORTAL.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, before hiring an applicant
for a position involving direct contact with minors, the county board, nonpublic school,
CHILD CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency shall:
(1) Review an applicant’s employment history by contacting the employers
listed by the applicant under subsection (b)(1) of this section and requesting the following
information:
(i) The dates of employment of the applicant; and
(ii) Answers to the questions regarding child sexual abuse [or],
sexual misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR required under subsection
(b)(3) of this section; [and]
(2) Request a report from the Department regarding the applicant’s
eligibility for employment or certification status to determine whether the applicant:

SENATE BILL 770
(i) Holds a valid and active certification appropriate for the position
and is otherwise eligible for employment; and
(ii) Has been the subject of professional discipline related to child
sexual abuse [or], sexual misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR; AND
(3) REQUEST A CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES BACKGROUND
CLEARANCE FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES TO DETERMINE IF THE
APPLICANT HAS BEEN IDENTIFIED AS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE ABUSE OR NEGLECT
OF A CHILD IN ANY RECORD MAINTAINED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES, ANY LOCAL DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL SERVICES, OR CHILD PROTECTIVE
SERVICES.
(d) (1) Not later than 20 days after receiving a request for information under
subsection (c) of this section, an employer shall send to the county board, nonpublic school,
CHILD CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency the
information requested on the form prescribed by the Department.
(2) If the information from an employer includes an affirmative response
to the child sexual abuse [or], sexual misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR
questions under subsection (b)(3) of this section, and the county board, nonpublic school,
CHILD CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency makes
a determination to further consider the applicant for employment, the county board,
nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or
contracting agency shall request that the former employer provide additional information
about the information provided, including all records related to child sexual abuse [or],
sexual misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR.
(3) An employer that receives a request for additional information under
paragraph (1) of this subsection shall provide the additional information within 60 days of
the date of the prospective employer’s request to:
(i) The requesting county board, nonpublic school, CHILD CARE
CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency; and
(ii) The applicant who is under consideration for employment.
(e) (1) A county board [or], nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER, OR
YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION may hire an applicant as an emergent employee for a
period not to exceed 60 days pending the review of information and records required under
this section only if:
(i) The applicant has provided all the information and supporting
documentation required under this section;

SENATE BILL 770 9
(ii) An employer has no knowledge of information regarding the
applicant that would disqualify the applicant from employment;
(iii) The applicant swears or affirms that the applicant is not
disqualified from employment; and
(iv) The applicant is not authorized to work alone with minors unless
the applicant:
1. Works in the immediate vicinity of a permanent employee;
or
2. If the applicant is a school vehicle driver, is subject to
audio and video monitoring and recording, which is promptly reviewed by school
administrators.
(2) Based on the employment history review required under subsection (c)
of this section, at any time within 60 days after hiring an applicant as an emergent
employee, the county board [or], nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER, OR
YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION may:
(i) Rescind the offer of employment; or
(ii) Complete the emergent employee’s hiring process, in accordance
with the provisions of this title, with any executed contract reflecting the first day worked
as an emergent employee.
(3) Within 60 days after hiring an applicant as an emergent employee, a
county board’s decision to dismiss the emergent employee, for any reason other than child
sexual abuse [or], sexual misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR, may be
appealed:
(i) In accordance with § 4–205 of this article;
(ii) In accordance with the collective bargaining agreement
applicable to the emergent employee; or
(iii) If applicable, in accordance with § 6–202 of this title.
(f) (1) A county board [or], nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER, OR
YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION is authorized to share an employment history review
required under subsection (c) of this section with other county boards [and], nonpublic
schools, CHILD CARE CENTERS, AND YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATIONS.
(2) A contracting agency is authorized to share an employment history
review required under subsection (c) of this section with other contracting agencies.

SENATE BILL 770
(g) (1) A county board [or], nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER, OR
YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION may use an employment history review completed by
a current or former employer in the manner required under subsection (c) of this section if
the employer is a county board [or], nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER, OR
YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION and the applicant:
(i) Swears or affirms that the completed employment history review
includes all prior employment required to be reported under this section; and
(ii) Provides information about any employment subsequent to the
previous employment history review by the current or former county board [or], nonpublic
school, CHILD CARE CENTER, OR YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION.
(2) A contracting agency may use an employment history review completed
by a current or former employer in the manner required under subsection (c) of this section
if the employer is a contracting agency and the applicant:
(i) Swears or affirms that the completed employment history review
includes all prior employment required to be reported under this section; and
(ii) Provides information about any employment subsequent to the
previous employment history review by the contracting agency.
(h) (1) (i) A county board, nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER,
YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency shall conduct an employment
history review of an applicant for a substitute position involving direct contact with minors
as required under subsection (c) of this section before the initial hiring of the substitute
employee or placement on the approved substitute employee list of the county board,
nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or
contracting agency.
(ii) An employment history review of a substitute employee shall
remain valid as long as the substitute employee continues to be employed by the same
county board or remains on the approved substitute employee list of the nonpublic school,
CHILD CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency.
(2) If a substitute employee is seeking to be added to the substitute
employee list of another county board, nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER,
YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency, a new employment history
review in accordance with subsection (c) of this section is required.
(3) The appearance of a substitute employee on the substitute employee
list of one county board, nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING
ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency does not relieve another county board, nonpublic

SENATE BILL 770 11
school, CHILD CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency
of the duty of compliance with this section.
(4) An employment history review conducted on the initial hiring of a
substitute employee by a contracting agency, an intermediate unit, or any other entity that
provides substitute staffing services to a county board [or a], nonpublic school, CHILD
CARE CENTER, OR YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION shall satisfy the requirements of
this section for all school entities using the services of that contracting agency, intermediate
unit, or other entity.
(5) A contracting agency, an intermediate unit, or any other entity
providing substitute staffing services to a school entity shall comply with the provisions of
this section.
(i) (1) (i) A contracting agency shall conduct an employment history
review of an applicant for employment with the contracting agency as required under
subsection (c) of this section:
1. At the time of the initial hiring of the employee; or
2. Before the employee is assigned to work for a school entity
in a position involving direct contact with minors.
(ii) The employment history review under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph shall remain valid as long as the employee continues to be employed by the
hiring contracting agency.
(iii) A contracting agency shall:
1. Maintain a record of each employee’s employment history
review required under this subsection; and
2. On request of the school entity to which an employee is
assigned, provide access to the contracting agency’s records of that employee.
(2) (i) Before assigning an employee to perform work for a school entity
in a position involving direct contact with minors, a contracting agency shall provide notice
to the school entity of any affirmative responses to the child sexual abuse [or], sexual
misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR questions required under subsection
(b)(3) of this section.
(ii) A contracting agency may not assign an employee to perform
work for a school entity in a position involving direct contact with minors if the school entity
objects to the assignment after receiving the notice required under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph.

SENATE BILL 770
(j) (1) Information and records about an applicant received by a county board,
nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or
contracting agency under this section are not a public record for the purposes of the
Maryland Public Information Act.
(2) A county board, nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER,
YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency that receives information and
records from an employer about an applicant under this section may:
(i) Use the information and records for the purpose of evaluating the
applicant’s fitness to be hired or for continued employment; and
(ii) Report the information to the Department, a State licensing
agency, a law enforcement agency, a child protective services agency, another school entity,
or any other prospective employer, as appropriate.
(k) (1) A county board, nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER,
YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency may not enter into a collective
bargaining agreement, an employment contract, an agreement for resignation or
termination, a severance agreement, or any other contract or agreement that:
(i) Has the effect of suppressing information relating to an
investigation or disciplinary action in response to a report of suspected child sexual abuse
[or], sexual misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR by a current or former
employee;
(ii) Affects the ability of the county board, nonpublic school, CHILD
CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency to report
suspected child sexual abuse [or], sexual misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING
BEHAVIOR to the appropriate authorities; or
(iii) Requires the county board, nonpublic school, CHILD CARE
CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency to expunge
information about allegations or findings of suspected child sexual abuse [or], sexual
misconduct, OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR from any document maintained by
the employer unless the investigation resulted in a finding by:
1. The employer that allegations that the applicant engaged
in sexual misconduct OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR lacked sufficient evidence
according to the policies of the county board [or], nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER,
OR YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION;
2. An arbitrator or a county board to reject any disciplinary
action in response to allegations that the applicant engaged in sexual misconduct OR
BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR;

SENATE BILL 770 13
3. A State licensing agency that allegations that the
applicant engaged in sexual misconduct OR BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR lacked
sufficient evidence according to:
A. State law; or
B. The policies of the county board [or], nonpublic school,
CHILD CARE CENTER, OR YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION;
4. A law enforcement agency that allegations that the
applicant engaged in child sexual abuse were unfounded; or
5. A child protective services agency that allegations that the
applicant engaged in child sexual abuse were ruled out.
(2) A provision of an employment contract, an agreement for resignation or
termination, or a severance agreement that is executed, amended, or entered into on or
after July 1, 2019, and that is contrary to this section is void and unenforceable.
(l) If there is a lapse in the operation of or the Department suspends the use of a
system or database that the Department uses to check an applicant’s eligibility for
employment or certification status, the Department shall notify the county boards,
nonpublic schools, CHILD CARE CENTERS, YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATIONS, and any
contracting agencies within 48 hours of the lapse or the suspension of the use of the system
or database.
(m) (1) A person acting in good faith may not be held liable for disclosing any
information or records related to child sexual abuse [or], sexual misconduct, OR
BOUNDARY–VIOLATING BEHAVIOR about a current or former employee’s professional
conduct or reason for termination of employment to a county board, a nonpublic school, A
CHILD CARE CENTER, A YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, a contracting agency, the
Department, or any other potential employer in accordance with this section unless the
person:
(i) Acted with actual malice toward the employee or former
employee; or
(ii) Intentionally or recklessly disclosed false information about the
employee or former employee.
(2) The immunity from liability under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall be in addition to, and not a limitation of, any other immunity provided by law or any
absolute or conditional privilege applicable to the disclosure of information or records or
the applicant’s consent to the disclosure.

SENATE BILL 770
(n) (1) An applicant who provides false information or willfully fails to disclose
material information required under this section shall be subject to professional discipline,
including termination or denial of employment, and may be subject to professional
discipline in accordance with the regulations of the Department.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the willful failure
of an employer or former employer to respond to or provide the information and records
requested by a county board, nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER, YOUTH–SERVING
ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency under this section may result in civil penalties or
professional discipline, if appropriate.
(ii) An employer or a former employer may not be held liable for
failure to respond to a request for information about an applicant under this section if:
1. The laws of the state in which the employer or former
employer is located prohibit the release of the information or records requested; or
2. The disclosure of the information and records requested is
restricted by the terms of a contract entered into on or before June 30, 2019.
(3) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department
may initiate disciplinary action before a hearing officer in accordance with the
Department’s regulations against an applicant, an employee, a contracting agency, or a
school administrator for willful violations of this section.
(ii) The Department may adopt regulations establishing procedures
for disciplinary proceedings and the assessment of penalties in accordance with this section.
(o) Nothing in this section shall be construed:
(1) To prevent a county board, nonpublic school, CHILD CARE CENTER,
YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, or contracting agency from:
(i) Conducting further investigations of prospective employees;
(ii) Requesting applicants to provide additional background
information or authorizations beyond the information or authorizations required under this
section; or
(iii) Requesting that an employer or a former employer provide more
information than is required under this section;
(2) To relieve a county board, a nonpublic school, A CHILD CARE CENTER,
A YOUTH–SERVING ORGANIZATION, a contracting agency, or any other mandated
reporter of the legal responsibility to report suspected incidents of child sexual abuse or

SENATE BILL 770 15
sexual misconduct in accordance with State law or the reporting requirements of the
Department; or
(3) To prohibit the right of an exclusive representative under a collective
bargaining agreement to grieve and arbitrate the validity of an employee’s termination or
discipline for just cause or for the causes set forth in this section.
6–113.3.
(A) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT:
(1) THE TRAINING PROGRAM AND INSTRUCTION DEVELOPED AND
IMPLEMENTED UNDER § 6–113.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) THE POLICIES AND PROCEDURES FOR SCREENING APPLICANTS
FOR POSITIONS INVOLVING DIRECT CONTACT WITH MINORS UNDER § 6–113.2 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) THE EMPLOYEE CODE OF CONDUCT FOR THE COUNTY BOARD AND
EACH NONPUBLIC SCHOOL AND CONTRACTING AGENCY IN THE COUNTY.
(B) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2025, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COMPILE AND REPORT THE INFORMATION
RECEIVED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY,
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
9.5–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) (1) “Child care center” means an agency, institution, or establishment that,
for part or all of a day, or on a 24–hour basis on a regular schedule, and at least twice a
week, offers or provides child care to children who do not have the same parentage except
as otherwise provided for in law or regulation.
(2) “Child care center” shall include a nonpublic nursery school in which
an instructional program is offered or provided for children who are under the age of 5
years.
(3) “Child care center” does not include:
(i) A nonpublic kindergarten in which an instructional program is
offered or provided for children who are at least 5 years old;

SENATE BILL 770
(ii) A nonpublic elementary school in which an instructional
program is offered or provided for children who are in grades 1 through 8;
(iii) A child care home, a child care institution, or other child care
facility that offers or provides a residential placement for a child and is established,
licensed, or registered under this title, Title 9 of the Human Services Article, or Title 10 of
the Health – General Article; or
(iv) A family child care home or large family child care home that is
required to be registered or is registered under this title.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The State Department of Education shall convene a diverse stakeholder
workgroup to examine the impact on:
(1) the public school systems in the State of adding a requirement to the
hiring process for applicants for a position involving direct contact with minors to include
information regarding the applicant’s history of boundary–violating behavior; and
(2) youth–serving organizations in the State of adding requirements for
hiring personnel and organization registration with an appropriate government agency.
(b) (1) The State Superintendent of Schools shall select the members of the
workgroup.
(2) The workgroup shall, at minimum, include representation from:
(i) the Maryland State’s Attorneys’ Association;
(ii) the Maryland Chapter of the Academy of Pediatrics;
(iii) the Maryland State Child Care Association;
(iv) the Maryland State Family Child Care Association;
(v) the State Council on Child Abuse and Neglect;
(vi) the Maryland Association of Counties;
(vii) the Maryland Municipal League;
(viii) the Maryland Department of Health; and
(ix) a child advocacy center.

SENATE BILL 770 17
(c) (1) In this subsection, “boundary–violating behavior” means an adult
behaving in a manner that:
(i) compromises the safety and well–being of a minor;
(ii) is exploitative or harmful to a minor; or
(iii) is otherwise inappropriate, including unwanted physical contact,
emotional manipulation or abuse, or sharing inappropriate information.
(2) The workgroup shall review the definition of boundary–violating
behavior to determine whether it is sufficiently precise, specific, and unambiguous to be
clearly understood by employers to describe a specific set of behaviors and actions that are
harmful to minors and distinct from existing criminal behaviors.
(3) If the workgroup does not find that the definition of boundary–violating
behavior set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection is sufficiently precise, specific, and
unambiguous, the workgroup shall recommend a definition of boundary–violating behavior
that meets the criteria in paragraph (1) of this subsection, if possible.
(4) The workgroup shall examine the impact on the public school system in
Maryland of implementing a change to the hiring process requiring an applicant for a
position involving direct contact with minors to include information regarding the
applicant’s history of boundary–violating behavior, as defined under paragraph (1) or (3) of
this subsection, in the following areas for cost, administrative burden, and timeliness:
(i) hiring process;
(ii) licensing;
(iii) training and professional development; and
(iv) enforcement.
(d) (1) In this subsection, “youth–serving organization” means an
organization, an institution, an agency, a government program, a community group, or any
other entity that is responsible for the care, supervision, guidance, education, development,
or training of minors, including after school programs, mentor programs, summer camps,
and recreational sports leagues and teams.
(2) The workgroup shall review the definition of youth–serving
organization to determine whether it is sufficiently precise, specific, and unambiguous to
be clearly understood by an organization that would be subject to potential hiring and
registration requirements that the organization is subject to those requirements.
(3) If the workgroup does not find that the definition of youth–serving
organization set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection is sufficiently precise, specific, and

SENATE BILL 770
unambiguous, the workgroup shall recommend a definition of youth–serving organization
that meets the criteria in paragraph (1) of this subsection, if possible.
(4) The workgroup shall examine the impact on youth–serving
organizations in the State by implementing a change to the hiring process requiring an
applicant for a position involving direct contact with minors to include information
regarding the applicant’s history of boundary–violating behavior, as defined under
subsection (c)(1) or (3) of this section, in the following areas for cost, administrative burden,
and timeliness:
(i) hiring process;
(ii) licensing, if applicable;
(iii) training; and
(iv) enforcement.
(5) The workgroup shall discuss and recommend an appropriate State
government agency to administer a registration process and provide oversight for any
hiring requirements for youth–serving organizations.
(e) On or before December 1, 2025, the State Department of Education shall
submit a report on the findings and recommendations of the workgroup established under
this section to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.